Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.230

Bond not void for want of form—Successive recoveries.

No bond required under the provisions of this chapter, and intended as such bond, shall be void for want of form, recital or condition; nor shall the principal or surety on such account be discharged, but all the parties thereto shall be held and bound to the full extent contemplated by the law requiring the same, to the amount specified in such bond. In all actions on such defective bond the plaintiff may state its legal effect in the same manner as though it were a perfect bond. The bond shall not be void upon the first recovery, but may be sued and recovered upon, from time to time, by any person aggrieved in his or her own name, until the whole penalty is exhausted.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2019; 1965 c 145 s 11.28.230. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 73; RRS s 1443; prior: Code 1881 ss 1412, 1397; 1877 p 211 s 4; 1854 p 219 s 489.]

NOTES:

Bond not to fail for want of form or substance: RCW 19.72.170.